California statutes. Business and Professions Code
A wholesaler, upon discovery, shall notify the board in writing of any suspicious orders of controlled substances placed by a California-licensed pharmacy or wholesaler by providing the board a copy of the information that the wholesaler provides to the United States Drug Enforcement Administration. Suspicious orders include, but are not limited to, orders of unusual size, orders deviating substantially from a normal pattern, and orders of unusual frequency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 548, Sec. 8.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11.5. Surplus Medication Collection and Distribution Intermediaries [4169.5. - 4169.5.]

4169.5.

(a) A surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary established for the purpose of facilitating the donation of medications to or transfer of medications between participating entities under a program established pursuant to Division 116 (commencing with Section 150200) of the Health and Safety Code shall be licensed by the board. The board shall enforce the requirements set forth in Section 150208 of the Health and Safety Code. The license shall be renewed annually. 

(b) An application for licensure as a surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary shall be made on a form furnished by the board, and shall state the name,
 address, usual occupation, and professional qualifications, if any, of the applicant. If the applicant is an entity other than a natural person, the application shall state the information as to each person beneficially interested in that entity.

(c) As used in this section, and subject to subdivision (e), the term “person beneficially interested” means and includes:

(1) If the applicant is a partnership or other unincorporated association, each partner or member.

(2) If the applicant is a corporation, each of its officers, directors, and stockholders, provided that no natural person shall be deemed to be beneficially interested in a nonprofit corporation.

(3) If
 the applicant is a limited liability company, each officer, manager, or member.

(d) If the applicant is a charitable organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, the applicant shall furnish the board with the organization’s articles of incorporation. The applicant shall also furnish the board with the names of the controlling members.

(e) If the applicant is a partnership or other unincorporated association, a limited liability company, or a corporation, and if the number of partners, members, or stockholders, as the case may be, exceeds five, the application shall so state, and shall further state the information required by subdivision
 (b)
 as to each of the five partners, members, or stockholders who own the five largest interests in the applicant’s entity. Upon request by the executive officer of the board, the applicant shall furnish the board with the information required by subdivision (b) as to partners, members, or stockholders not named in the application, or shall refer the board to an appropriate source of that information.

(f) The application shall contain a statement to the effect that the applicant or persons beneficially interested have not been convicted of a felony and have not violated any of the provisions of this chapter. If the applicant cannot make this statement, the application
 shall contain a statement of the violation, if any, or reasons which will prevent the applicant from being able to comply with the requirements with respect to the statement.

(g) Upon the approval of the application by the board and payment of a fee in the amount of three hundred dollars ($300), the executive officer of the board shall issue or renew a license to operate as a surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary, if all of the provisions of this chapter have been complied with. Fees received by the board pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Pharmacy Board Contingent Fund. An applicant for licensure as a surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary that is government owned or is a nonprofit organization pursuant to subdivision (d) is exempt from the fee requirement.

(h) A surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary licensed pursuant to this section is exempt from licensure as a wholesaler.

(i) A surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary licensed pursuant to this section shall keep and maintain for three years complete records for which the intermediary facilitated the donation of medications to or transfer of medications between participating entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 10, Sec. 2.   (AB 467)   Effective April 9, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11.7 Cancer Medication Collection and Distribution: Registry of Participating Practitioners [4169.7. - 4169.8.]

4169.7.

(a) A participating practitioner in the collection and distribution of unused cancer medications pursuant to the program established pursuant to Division 117 (commencing with Section 150400) of the Health and Safety Code shall be registered with a surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary, as defined in Section 150401 of the Health and Safety Code, in accordance with this section. The registration shall be renewed annually.

(b) An application for registration with a surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary shall be made on a
 form, which may be in an electronic format, furnished by the surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary, and shall state the name, address, usual occupation, and professional qualifications, if any, of the applicant.

(c) Upon the approval of an application by a surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary, and payment of a fee in an amount not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) to the surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary for processing the application and issuing or renewing the registration, the surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary shall issue or renew a registration certificate to operate as a participating practitioner, if the practitioner has complied with all of the provisions of this chapter.

(d) A surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary shall do all of the following:

(1) Create a registry, not to exceed 50 participating practitioners.

(2) Develop a donor form that may be in an electronic format and that shall include all of the following information:

(A) The date the medication was donated.

(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the donor.

(C) The name, strength, and quantity of the medication.

(D) The manufacturer and lot
 number, if applicable, of the medication.

(E) The name and dated signature of the practitioner who is accepting and inspecting the donated medication.

(F) An acknowledgment that the medication was handled and stored in accordance with the physician’s order and per the manufacturer’s recommendation.

(3) Develop a recipient form, which may be in an electronic format, and which shall include all of the following:

(A) The date the recipient received the medication.

(B) The name,
 address, and telephone number of the recipient.

(C) The name, strength, and quantity of the medication.

(D) The manufacturer and the lot number, if applicable, of the medication.

(E) The name and dated signature of the practitioner who is accepting and inspecting the donated medication.

(F) An acknowledgment that the donor is known to the practitioner and is a patient of record, and that there is no reason to believe that the donated prescription medication was improperly handled or stored.

(G) An acknowledgment that by accepting the donated prescription medication, the recipient accepts any risks that an accidental mishandling could create.

(H) An acknowledgment that the donor, the participating practitioner, and the surplus medication
 collection and distribution intermediary are released from liability arising from their participation pursuant to this article and the program established pursuant to Division 117 (commencing with Section 150400) of the Health and Safety Code.

(I) An acknowledgment that the pharmaceutical manufacturer is released from liability of any claims or injury arising from the transfer of any prescription medication pursuant to this article and the program established pursuant to Division 117 (commencing with Section 150400) of the Health and Safety Code.

(J) An acknowledgment that the recipient is receiving donated prescription medication and that the recipient is receiving the donated prescription medication at no cost.

(e) A participating practitioner is exempt from licensure as a wholesaler.

(f) A participating practitioner shall keep and maintain for three years records created by the participating practitioner for purposes of this article.

(g) The board may request records from the distribution intermediary and participating practitioner to confirm compliance with this section and Section 150400 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) The board may prohibit a participating practitioner from participating in the program established pursuant to Division 117 (commencing with Section 150400) of the Health and Safety Code if the participating practitioner does not comply with the
 requirements of the program or this article. If the board prohibits a participating practitioner from participating in the program, it shall, within 15 days of making that determination, provide written notice to the participating practitioner and to the surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary that issued the participating practitioner a registration certificate to operate as a participating practitioner.

(i) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Donor” means an individual who donates unused prescription medications to a participating practitioner for the purpose of redistribution to established patients of that practitioner.

(2) “Ineligible drugs” means drugs that are not able to be accepted for redistribution as part of the program established pursuant to Division 117 (commencing with Section 150400) of the Health and Safety Code. “Ineligible drugs” include all controlled substances, including all opioids, all compounded medications, injectable medications, drugs that have an approved United States Food and Drug Administration Risk Evaluation and Mitigation Strategy (REMS) requirement, and all growth factor medications.

(3) “Participating practitioner”
 means a person who is licensed to practice medicine by the Medical Board of California and is board certified in medical oncology or hematology and is registered with a surplus medication collection and distribution intermediary.

(4) “Recipient” means an individual who voluntarily receives donated prescription medications.

(5) “Unused cancer medication” or “medication” means a medication or drug, including a “dangerous drug” as defined in Section 4022 or a “drug” as defined in Section 4025, that is
 prescribed as part of a cancer treatment plan and is in its original unopened, tamper-evident dose unit packaging that includes the drug’s lot number and expiration date. A cancer drug packaged in single-unit doses may be accepted and dispensed if the outside packaging is opened but the single-unit dose packaging is unopened.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (SB 310)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Sec. 4169.8.)
-------------------------------------------

4169.8.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   (SB 310)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 11.7, commencing with Section 4169.7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Prescriber Dispensing [4170. - 4175.]

4170.

(a) A prescriber shall not dispense drugs or dangerous devices to patients in the prescriber’s office or place of practice unless all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The dangerous drugs or dangerous devices are dispensed to the prescriber’s own patient, and the drugs or dangerous devices are not furnished by a nurse or physician attendant.

(2) The dangerous drugs or dangerous devices are necessary in the treatment of the condition for which the prescriber is attending the patient.

(3) The prescriber does not keep a pharmacy, open shop, or drugstore,
 advertised or otherwise, for the retailing of dangerous drugs, dangerous devices, or poisons.

(4) The prescriber fulfills all of the labeling requirements imposed upon pharmacists by Section 4076, all of the recordkeeping requirements of this chapter, and all of the packaging requirements of good pharmaceutical practice, including the use of childproof containers.

(5) The prescriber does not use a dispensing device unless the prescriber personally owns the device and the contents of the device, and personally dispenses the dangerous drugs or dangerous devices to the patient packaged, labeled, and recorded in accordance with paragraph (4).

(6) The prescriber, before dispensing, offers to give a written prescription
 to the patient that the patient may elect to have filled by the prescriber or by any pharmacy.

(7) The prescriber provides the patient with written disclosure that the patient has a choice between obtaining the prescription from the dispensing prescriber or obtaining the prescription at a pharmacy of the patient’s choice.

(b) A certified nurse-midwife who functions pursuant to a mutually agreed-upon policy or protocol described in Section 2746.5, a nurse practitioner who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure described in Section 2836.1, or protocol, a physician assistant who functions pursuant to Section 3502.1, or a naturopathic doctor who functions pursuant to Section 3640.5, may hand to a patient of the supervising physician and surgeon a properly labeled
 prescription drug prepackaged by a physician and surgeon, a manufacturer as defined in this chapter, or a pharmacist.

(c) The Medical Board of California, the California State Board of Optometry, the California Board of Naturopathic Medicine, the Dental Board of California, the Podiatric Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the Board of Registered Nursing, the Veterinary Medical Board, and the Physician Assistant Board shall have authority with the California State Board of Pharmacy to ensure compliance with this section, and those boards are specifically charged with the enforcement of this chapter with respect to their respective licensees.

(d) “Prescriber,” as used in this section, means a person who holds a physician’s and surgeon’s
 certificate, a license to practice optometry, a license to practice naturopathic medicine, a license to practice dentistry, a license to practice veterinary medicine, a certificate to practice podiatry, a certificate to practice as a nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2837.103 or 2837.104, or a certificate to practice as a nurse-midwife, and who is duly registered by the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California State Board of Optometry, the California Board of Naturopathic Medicine, the Dental Board of California, the Veterinary Medical Board, the Podiatric Medical Board of California, or the Board of Registered Nursing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 497, Sec. 4.   (SB 667)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4170.5.

(a) Veterinarians in a veterinary teaching hospital operated by an accredited veterinary medical school may dispense and administer dangerous drugs and devices and controlled substances from a common stock.

(b) The veterinary teaching hospital shall designate a pharmacist to be responsible for ordering the drugs for the common stock and the designated pharmacist-in-charge shall be professionally responsible to insure that inventories, security procedures, training, protocol development, recordkeeping, packaging, labeling, and dispensing occur in a manner that is consistent with the promotion and protection of the health and safety of the public.

(c) The veterinary teaching hospital’s pharmacist-in-charge shall develop policies, procedures, and guidelines that recognize the unique relationship between the institution’s pharmacists and veterinarians in the control, management, dispensation, and administration of drugs.

(d) The board may inspect a veterinary teaching hospital dispensing or administering drugs pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 695, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4171.

(a) Section 4170 shall not prohibit the furnishing of a limited quantity of samples by a prescriber, if the prescriber dispenses the samples to the patient in the package provided by the manufacturer, no charge is made to the patient therefor, and an appropriate record is entered in the patient’s chart.

(b) Section 4170 shall not apply to clinics, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1204 or subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, to programs licensed pursuant to Sections 11876, 11877, and 11877.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or to a prescriber dispensing parenteral chemotherapeutic agents, biologicals, or delivery systems used in the treatment of cancer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 250, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4172.

A prescriber who dispenses drugs pursuant to Section 4170 shall store all drugs to be dispensed in an area that is secure. The Medical Board of California shall, by regulation, define the term “secure” for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4173.

This chapter does not prevent the dispensing of drugs or devices by registered nurses functioning pursuant to Section 2725.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4174.

Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacist may dispense drugs or devices upon the drug order of a nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2836.1, 2837.103, or 2837.104, or a certified nurse-midwife functioning pursuant to Section 2746.51, a drug order of a physician assistant functioning pursuant to Section 3502.1 or a naturopathic doctor functioning pursuant to Section 3640.5, or the order of a pharmacist acting under Section 4052, 4052.04, 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 40.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4175.

(a) The California State Board of Pharmacy shall promptly forward to the appropriate licensing entity, including the Medical Board of California, the California Veterinary Medical Board, the Dental Board of California, the California State Board of Optometry, the Podiatric Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the Board of Registered Nursing, the California Board of Naturopathic Medicine, or the Physician Assistant Board, all complaints received related to dangerous drugs or dangerous devices dispensed by a prescriber, certified nurse-midwife, nurse practitioner, naturopathic doctor, or physician assistant pursuant to Section 4170.

(b) All complaints
 involving serious bodily injury due to dangerous drugs or dangerous devices dispensed by prescribers, certified nurse-midwives, nurse practitioners, naturopathic doctors, or physician assistants pursuant to Section 4170 shall be handled by the Medical Board of California, the Dental Board of California, the California State Board of Optometry, the Podiatric Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, the California Board of Naturopathic Medicine, the Board of Registered Nursing, the California Veterinary Medical Board, or the Physician Assistant Board as a case of greatest potential harm to a patient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 54.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Nonprofit or Free Clinics [4180. - 4186.]

4180.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, any of the following clinics may purchase drugs at wholesale for administration or dispensing, under the direction of a physician and surgeon, to patients registered for care at the clinic:

(A) A licensed nonprofit community clinic or free clinic as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A primary care clinic owned or operated by a county as referred to in subdivision (b) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) A clinic operated by a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribal organization as referred to in subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(D) A clinic operated by a primary care
 community or free clinic, operated on separate premises from a licensed clinic, and that is open no more than the number of hours per week as referred to in subdivision (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(E) A student health center clinic operated by a public institution of higher education as referred to in subdivision (j) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(F) A nonprofit multispecialty clinic as referred to in subdivision (l) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The clinic shall keep records of the kind and amounts of drugs purchased, administered, and dispensed, and the records shall be available and maintained for a minimum of three years for inspection by all properly authorized
 personnel.

(b) No clinic shall be entitled to the benefits of this section until it has obtained a license from the board. A separate license shall be required for each clinic location. A clinic shall notify the board of any change in the clinic’s address on a form furnished by the board.

(c) The board shall synchronize license renewal dates and aggregate fees for multiple clinics under common nonprofit ownership at the request of the parent organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 323, Sec. 1.   (AB 1723)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4181.

(a) Prior to the issuance of a clinic license authorized under Section 4180, the clinic shall comply with all applicable laws and regulations of the State Department of Public Health relating to the drug distribution service to ensure that inventories, security procedures, training, protocol development, recordkeeping, packaging, labeling, dispensing, and patient consultation occur in a manner that is consistent with the promotion and protection of the health and safety of the public. The policies and procedures to implement the laws and regulations shall be developed and approved by the consulting pharmacist, the professional director, and the clinic administrator.

(b) The dispensing
 of drugs in a clinic shall be performed only by a physician, a pharmacist, or other person lawfully authorized to dispense drugs, and only in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 30.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4182.

(a) Each clinic that makes an application for a license under Section 4180 shall show evidence that the professional director is responsible for the safe, orderly, and lawful provision of pharmacy services. In carrying out the professional director’s responsibilities, a consulting pharmacist shall be retained to approve the policies and procedures in conjunction with the professional director and the administrator. In addition, the consulting pharmacist shall be required to visit the clinic regularly and at least quarterly. However, nothing in this section shall prohibit the consulting pharmacist from visiting more than quarterly to review the application of policies and procedures based on the agreement of all the parties approving the policies and procedures.

(b) The consulting pharmacist shall certify in writing quarterly that the clinic is, or is not, operating in compliance with the requirements of this article. Each completed written certification shall be kept on file in the clinic for three years and shall include recommended corrective actions, if appropriate.

(c) For the purposes of this article, “professional director” means a physician and surgeon acting in his or her capacity as medical director or a dentist or podiatrist acting in his or her capacity as a director in a clinic where only dental or podiatric services are provided.

(d) Licensed clinics shall notify the board within 30 days of any change in professional director on a form furnished by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4183.

No clinic dispensing drugs pursuant to this article shall be eligible for any professional dispensing fee that may be authorized under the Medi-Cal program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4184.

(a) Except as described in subdivision (b), a Schedule II controlled substance shall not be dispensed by the clinic. This limitation does not prohibit a physician dispensing a Schedule II drug to the extent permitted by law.

(b) A practitioner authorized to prescribe a narcotic drug at a clinic registered with the board pursuant to this chapter and with any necessary federal agencies may dispense that narcotic drug from clinic supply for the purpose of relieving acute withdrawal symptoms when necessary while arrangements are being made for referral for treatment consistent with Section 1306.07(b) of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) A narcotic drug that is dispensed from a clinic’s supply pursuant to subdivision (b) is subject to the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 11165 of the Health and Safety Code, the labeling requirements imposed upon pharmacists by Section 4076, the recordkeeping requirements of this chapter, and all of the packaging requirements of good pharmaceutical practice, including, but not limited to, the use of childproof containers.

(d) A clinic with a supply of narcotic drugs that is being dispensed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall establish policies or procedures for dispensing, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Assessment of the patient’s ability to safely manage and self-administer a
 narcotic drug for the purposes of treating withdrawal.

(2) Assessment of the patient’s appropriateness for medications for opioid use disorder.

(3) Connecting patients to ongoing treatment for opioid use disorder.

(4) Limiting dispensing to patients who return for repeated withdrawal medication to ensure treatment is not renewed or extended. 

(e) The dispensing of a narcotic drug shall be performed only by a physician, a pharmacist, or other person lawfully authorized to dispense drugs, and only in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations.

(f) It is the intent of the
 Legislature that a clinic from which narcotic drugs are dispensed operate under appropriate registration and licensing and prioritize safe and secure storage, including any inventory reconciliation methodology, consistent with regulations, to prevent loss or diversion of controlled substances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 634, Sec. 1.   (AB 2115)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4185.

The board shall have the authority to inspect a clinic at any time in order to determine whether a clinic is, or is not, operating in compliance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4186.

(a) Automated drug delivery systems, as defined in Section 4017.3, may be located in any clinic licensed by the board pursuant to Section 4180. If an automated drug delivery system is located in a clinic, the clinic shall develop and implement written policies and procedures to ensure safety, accuracy, accountability, security, patient confidentiality, and maintenance of the quality, potency, and purity of drugs. All policies and procedures shall be maintained at the location where the automated drug system is being used.

(b) Drugs shall be removed from the automated drug delivery system only upon authorization by a pharmacist after the pharmacist has reviewed the prescription and the patient’s profile for potential contraindications and adverse
 drug reactions. Drugs removed from the automated drug delivery system shall be provided to the patient by a health professional licensed pursuant to this division.

(c) The stocking of an automated drug delivery system shall be performed by a pharmacist.

(d) Review of the drugs contained within, and the operation and maintenance of, the automated drug delivery system shall be the responsibility of the clinic. The review shall be conducted on a monthly basis by a pharmacist and shall include a physical inspection of the drugs in the automated drug delivery system, an inspection of the automated drug delivery system machine for cleanliness, and a review of all transaction records in order to verify the security and accountability of the system.

(e) The automated drug delivery system used at the clinic shall provide for
 patient consultation pursuant to Section 1707.2 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations with a pharmacist via a telecommunications link that has two-way audio and video.

(f) The pharmacist operating the automated drug delivery system shall be located in California.

(g) Drugs dispensed from the automated drug delivery system shall comply with the labeling requirements in Section 4076 and with Section 1707.5 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 666, Sec. 7.   (SB 1447)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13.5. Correctional Clinics [4187. - 4187.5.]

4187.

For purposes of this article the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Correctional clinic” means a primary care clinic, as referred to in subdivision (b) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, conducted, maintained, or operated by the state to provide health care to eligible patients of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(b) “Chief executive officer” means the highest ranking health care administrator at a correctional institution.

(c) “Chief medical executive” means a physician and surgeon acting in the capacity of medical director within the correctional institution.

(d) “Chief nurse executive” means the highest ranking nurse within the correctional institution.

(e) “Licensed correctional clinic” means a correctional clinic that is licensed pursuant to this article.

(f) “Supervising dentist” means the highest ranking dentist within the correctional institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 6.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4187.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a correctional clinic licensed by the board under this article may obtain drugs from a licensed correctional pharmacy, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Central Fill Pharmacy, or from another correctional clinic licensed by the board under this article within the same institution for the administration or dispensing of drugs or devices to patients eligible for care at the correctional facility if under either:

(1) The direction of a physician and surgeon, dentist, or other person lawfully authorized to prescribe.

(2) An approved protocol as identified within the statewide Inmate Medical Services Policies and Procedures.

(b) The dispensing or administering of drugs in a correctional clinic may be performed pursuant to a chart order, as defined in Section 4019, a valid prescription consistent with this chapter, or pursuant to an approved protocol as identified within the statewide Inmate Medical Services Policies and Procedures. The dispensing of drugs in a correctional clinic shall only be performed by a physician and surgeon, a dentist, a pharmacist, or other person lawfully authorized to dispense drugs. Medications dispensed to patients that are to be kept on the patient’s person for use shall meet the labeling requirements of Section 4076 and all recordkeeping requirements of this chapter.

(c) A correctional clinic shall keep records of the kind and amounts of drugs acquired, administered, transferred, and dispensed. The records shall be available and maintained for a minimum of three years for
 inspection by all properly authorized personnel.

(d) (1) A correctional clinic shall not be entitled to the benefits of this section until it has obtained a license from the board.

(2) A separate license shall be required for each correctional clinic location and shall not be transferrable.

(3) A correctional clinic’s location and address shall be identified by correctional institution and building within that correctional institution.

(4) A clinic shall notify the board in advance of any change in the clinic’s address on a form furnished by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 6.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4187.2.

(a) The policies and procedures to implement the laws and regulations of this article within a correctional clinic shall be developed and approved by the statewide Correctional Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee referenced in Section 5024.2 of the Penal Code. Prior to the issuance of a correctional clinic license by the board, an acknowledgment shall be signed by the correctional facility pharmacist-in-charge servicing that institution, the pharmacist-in-charge for the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Central Fill Pharmacy, and the correctional clinic’s chief medical executive, supervising dentist, chief nurse executive, and chief executive officer.

(b) (1) The chief executive officer shall be responsible for the safe, orderly, and lawful provision of pharmacy services. The pharmacist-in-charge of servicing the correctional facility shall implement the policies and procedures developed and approved by the statewide Correctional Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee referenced in Section 5024.2 of the Penal Code and the California Correctional Health Care Services Health Care Department Operations Manual in conjunction with the chief executive officer, the chief medical executive, the supervising dentist, and the chief nurse executive.

(2) A licensed correctional clinic shall notify the board within 30 days of any change in the chief executive officer on a form furnished by the board.

(c) A correctional clinic shall
 be inspected at least quarterly by a pharmacist of the correctional pharmacy assigned to service that facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 29, Sec. 2.   (SB 118)   Effective August 6, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4187.3.

A Schedule II, III, IV, or V controlled substance may be administered by health care staff of the licensed correctional clinic lawfully authorized to administer pursuant to a chart order, as defined in Section 4019, a valid prescription consistent with this chapter, or pursuant to an approved protocol as identified within the statewide Inmate Medical Services Policies and Procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 6.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4187.4.

The board shall have the authority to inspect a correctional clinic at any time in order to determine whether a correctional clinic is, or is not, operating in compliance with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 6.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4187.5.

(a) An automated drug delivery system, as defined in subdivision (h), may be located in a correctional clinic licensed by the board under this article. If an automated drug delivery system is located in a correctional clinic, the correctional clinic shall implement the statewide Correctional Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee’s policies and procedures and the California Correctional Health Care Services Health Care Department Operations Manual to ensure safety, accuracy, accountability, security, patient confidentiality, and maintenance of the quality, potency, and purity of drugs. All policies and procedures shall be maintained either in electronic form or paper form at the location where the automated drug system is being used.

(b) Drugs shall be removed from the automated drug delivery system upon authorization by a pharmacist after the pharmacist has reviewed the prescription and the patient profile for potential contraindications and adverse drug reactions. Where administration of the drug is necessary before a pharmacist has reviewed the prescription, and if, in the prescriber’s professional judgment, delay in therapy may cause patient harm, a medication may be removed from the automated drug delivery system and administered or furnished to a patient under the direction of the prescriber. Where the drug is otherwise unavailable, a medication may be removed and administered or furnished to the patient pursuant to an approved protocol as identified within the California Correctional Health Care Services Health Care Department Operations Manual. Any removal of
 medication from an automated drug delivery system shall be documented and provided to the correctional pharmacy when it reopens.

(c) Drugs removed from the automated drug delivery system shall be provided to the patient by a health professional licensed pursuant to this division who is lawfully authorized to perform that task.

(d) The stocking of an automated drug delivery system shall be performed by either:

(1) A pharmacist.

(2) An intern pharmacist or pharmacy technician, acting under the supervision of a pharmacist.

(e) Review of the drugs contained within, and the operation and maintenance
 of, the automated drug delivery system shall be the responsibility of the correctional clinic. The review shall be conducted on a monthly basis by a pharmacist and shall include a physical inspection of the drugs in the automated drug delivery system, an inspection of the automated drug delivery system machine for cleanliness, and a review of all transaction records in order to verify the security and accountability of the system.

(f) The automated drug delivery system shall be operated by a licensed correctional pharmacy. Any drugs within an automated drug delivery system are considered owned by the licensed correctional pharmacy until they are dispensed from the automated drug delivery system.

(g) Drugs from the automated drug delivery system in a correctional clinic shall
 only be removed by a person authorized to stock the automated drug delivery system, or by a person lawfully authorized to administer or dispense the drugs.
